Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-7-101. Establishment — Personnel.

There shall be a police force to be known and designated as the Tennessee highway patrol, which shall consist of one (1) chief and such other personnel as may be designated by the commissioner of safety, with the approval of the governor.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 1; Code 1932, § 11460; Acts 1951, ch. 256, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-701.

Cross-References. Compensation of law-enforcement officers for injury or death, title 7, ch. 51, part 2.

4-7-102. Members — Conditions of employment — Oath.

The members of the Tennessee highway patrol shall be appointed by the commissioner of safety, by and with the consent and approval of the governor.

Members shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commissioner.

Members' compensation is to be fixed by the commissioner, with the approval of the governor.

Each member of the Tennessee highway patrol, upon the member's appointment and before entering upon the member's duties, shall swear and subscribe to the following oath:

“I do solemnly swear that I will support the Constitution of Tennessee, and will well and faithfully perform the duties imposed upon me as a member of the Tennessee highway patrol to the best of my ability; that I will serve the state of Tennessee honestly and faithfully, and will obey the orders of the officers and officials placed over me according to law.”

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, each member employed after July 1, 2006, shall meet the requirements for minimum standards as set forth in title 38, chapter 8, part 1, and as required by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission; however, these Tennessee highway patrol members shall not be entitled to receive a police pay supplement as authorized under § 38-8-111.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 2; Code 1932, § 11461; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 27; impl. am. Acts 1945, ch. 28, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 11461; Acts 1951, ch. 256, § 2; 1970, ch. 601, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-702; Acts 2006, ch. 1009, § 1.

4-7-103. List of applicants to fill vacancies — County of residence.

When the commissioner of safety proposes to fill a vacancy in the highway patrol, the commissioner shall request the commissioner of human resources to certify the names of persons eligible for appointment.

The commissioner of human resources shall certify to the commissioner of safety a list of the top eligible applicants from the register.

Residence of the applicants shall be disregarded in making up such a list.

In making appointments from among the eligible applicants on the list, the county of residence of the applicants may be considered in order to achieve some equitable distribution of positions in the state service in proportion to county populations.

Acts 1974, ch. 688, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-713; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-7-104. Duties.

It is the duty of the members of the Tennessee highway patrol, under the direction of the commissioner of safety, to:

Patrol the state highways and enforce all laws, and all rules and regulations of the department of transportation regulating traffic on and use of those highways; and

Assist the department of revenue and the county clerks of the state in the collection of all taxes and revenue going to the state, and in the enforcement of all laws relating to same.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, §§ 3, 4; Code 1932, § 11462; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 27; impl. am. Acts 1945, ch. 28, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 11462; Acts 1951, ch. 256, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 3, 14; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-703.

Cross-References. Enforcement of liquor laws, §57-3-412.

Grounds for arrest by an officer without a warrant, §40-7-103.

Powers of department of safety, §4-3-2003.

4-7-105. Enforcement of motor carrier laws.

The members of the Tennessee highway patrol have jurisdiction and authority to make such investigation of operators of motor vehicles for hire as they may see fit to ascertain whether or not they are operating in compliance with §65-15-109, and whether or not they are otherwise complying with the law relating to such operators, and they have authority to make arrests for any violation of title 65, chapter 15, or of any other traffic law of the state.

Acts 1931, ch. 79, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11463.2; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-704; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 69.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-7-105(a), concerning requiring operators of motor vehicles for hire to apply to the department of safety for a certificate of convenience and necessity, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

4-7-106. Enforcement of animal disease laws.

The Tennessee highway patrol is granted the further authority, and it is its duty, to enforce title 44, chapter 2, part 1, relative to the prevention of the spread of communicable diseases among domestic animals and protection to the livestock industry.

The Tennessee highway patrol is granted the same authority and police power to enforce title 44, chapter 2 as is vested in the commissioner of agriculture and in the state veterinarian by title 44, chapter 2.

Any fines assessed and collected under title 44, chapter 2, part 1 in arrests made by the Tennessee highway patrol shall be divided, one-half (½) to the department of agriculture and one-half (½) to the Tennessee highway patrol.

Acts 1939, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 11462; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-705.

4-7-107. Powers of members — Age — Uniforms — Protective vests.

The members of the Tennessee highway patrol are clothed with all such necessary police powers as will enable them properly to perform their duties, as outlined and defined in §§ 4-7-104 — 4-7-106, including the right to make arrests and the right to serve criminal warrants and subpoenas for witnesses. The fees taxed to them for arrests and service of warrants only for violations of the laws of the road and violations of the revenue laws of the state, and subpoenas are to be paid over to the commissioner of safety, and then to be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the general fund of this state, and such funds as may be necessary for the operation of the Tennessee highway patrol shall be made available through appropriation by the general assembly.

Each patrol officer appointed shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age.

All members of the Tennessee highway patrol when on duty shall wear a uniform to be designated by the commissioner of safety and shall be provided with a bullet-proof or protective vest for wear in hazardous situations.

All members of the Tennessee highway patrol shall be provided with training in proper procedures to respond to persons with mental illnesses.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 5; Code 1932, § 11463; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 27; impl. am. Acts 1945, ch. 28, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 11463; Acts 1951, ch. 256, § 2; 1963, ch. 274, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-706; Acts 1984, ch. 927, § 1; 2007, ch. 259, § 1.

Cross-References. Training to respond to mentally ill persons, §38-8-119.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Arrest (Rollins M. Perkins and Frank C. Rand), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 509 (1949).

4-7-108. Carrying pistol.

It is lawful for Tennessee highway patrol officers employed by the Tennessee highway patrol to wear or carry a pistol at such times as they are in uniform and on active duty, in like manner as the city or metropolitan police officers.

Acts 1931, ch. 62, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 11463.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-707.

4-7-109. Temporary retention of disabled member on payroll.

Whenever a commissioned member of the department of safety is injured in the line of duty and such injury disables the member from performing the member's regular duties, whether such disability is temporary or permanent, it is lawful for the commissioner of safety, in the commissioner's sound discretion and with the approval of the governor and the attorney general and reporter, to retain such injured disabled member of the department upon the regular payroll of the department until such member's claim for compensation for such disability is determined by the division of claims and risk management.

The discretionary authority granted to the commissioner in subsection (a) with respect to commissioned members of the department shall also extend in like manner to the department's driver license examiners who are injured and disabled in the line of duty.

In any recovery from, or settlement with, a third party made by such driver license examiners where the state receives any part of such recovery in compensation for payments made under this subsection (b), the state shall pay a pro rata share, based on the percentage of the recovery it receives, of any attorney fees paid or agreed to by the driver license examiner to secure such settlement or recovery.

Acts 1953, ch. 139, § 1 (Williams, § 11463.3); Acts 1977, ch. 20, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-710; Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 19(l); 1987, ch. 88, § 1; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Cross-References. Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, §4-6-148.

4-7-110. Retired commission card — Retention of service weapon and badge by retired members.

Any commissioned member of the department of safety, who performs honorably and retires from the department in good standing, as determined solely by the commissioner, shall be issued by the department a retired commission card, which shall identify the member, the member’s department and rank, and the fact that the member is retired. The card shall bear the inscription, in print of equal or larger size than the rest of the printing on the card, the words “Not a handgun permit.”

A commissioned member, who is issued a retired commission card pursuant to subsection (a), may retain the member’s service weapon and badge in recognition of the member’s years of good and faithful service; provided, that the member retires:

After twenty-five (25) or more years of service;

After twenty (20) or more years of service, as a result of disability; or

Upon attaining the mandatory retirement age imposed in title 8, chapter 36.

A commissioned member, who is issued a retired commission card pursuant to subsection (a) but who is not included within subdivision (b)(1), may retain the member’s service weapon and badge in recognition of the member’s years of good and faithful service; provided, that the member reimburses the department for the cost of the service weapon and badge.

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed to require the department to purchase additional service weapons.

Each badge retained pursuant to subsection (b) shall be permanently marked to indicate the retired status of the commissioned member.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a commissioned member of the department of safety dies or is killed in the line of duty, the department shall be authorized to present the member's service weapon to the member's surviving spouse or children, or, if the member had no spouse or children, to the member's parents.

If the surviving child or children are under twenty-one (21) years of age, the service weapon shall be given into the custody of the child's legal guardian to be held until the child or eldest surviving child attains twenty-one (21) years of age.

If the surviving spouse, child or children, surviving parents or legal guardian of such person is not eligible to possess a firearm under federal or state law, the department shall not present the service weapon to them.

Acts 1974, ch. 710, § 1; 1976, ch. 718, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-714; Acts 1982, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 88, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 2; 2009, ch. 147, § 1; 2010, ch. 753, § 1; 2011, ch. 444, § 1; 2012, ch. 903, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subdivision (a)(4), concerning commissioned members who retired prior to April 15, 1987, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

Cross-References. Written directive and permit to carry handguns, §39-17-1315.

4-7-111. Longevity pay.

In addition to all other salary benefits otherwise payable, every commissioned member of the department of safety shall be paid longevity pay according to the following schedule:

First through the fifth year — none;

Beginning with the month following the fifth anniversary of the member's employment, the sum of five dollars ($5.00) per month times the member's total years of service.

The longevity pay provided for in subsection (a) shall not be in lieu of merit raises, step increases or cost of living increases, but shall be in addition to all such increases.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent to reward experience and faithful service to the state and to encourage career law enforcement officers to remain in service to the state.

In addition to the five dollars ($5.00) per month longevity payment authorized in subsection (a), each eligible employee shall receive a longevity payment supplement in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per year for each year of creditable service with the Tennessee highway patrol for the first fifteen (15) years of service only.

Funds required to fund this section are hereby directed to be from the 1977 increase in driver license fees.

Acts 1977, ch. 341, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 4-715; Acts 1982, ch. 875, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-7-112. Rules and regulations — Expenses of patrol.

The commissioner of safety is charged with the proper administration of this part, and may make such rules and regulations relating thereto as may be necessary.

The expenses of carrying out this part, including the compensation of the members of the Tennessee highway patrol, and their necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, shall be paid out of the motor vehicle fund; provided, that such expenses and compensation shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of such fund per annum; and provided further, that only the net amount of the motor vehicle fund shall be subject to allocation between the department of transportation and the various counties.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 6; Code 1932, § 11464; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 44; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 27; Acts 1939, ch. 174, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1945, ch. 28, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 11464; Acts 1951, ch. 256, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-711.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Payment of allowance into tax administration fund, §67-1-104.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1948).

4-7-113. Construction of part.

This part is necessary to:

Protect the lives and safety of the traveling public on state highways;

Conserve and preserve the state's property; and

Assist in the collection of state revenues.

This part is remedial in nature and shall be construed liberally.

Acts 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 7; Code 1932, § 11465; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-712.

4-7-114. Enforcement of anti-theft laws.

The members of the Tennessee highway patrol have jurisdiction and authority, and it is their duty, to aid in the enforcement of the criminal provisions of title 55, chapter 5 and § 39-14-103, whenever an alleged violation of those statutory provisions involves unlawful taking of a motor vehicle.

Members of the highway patrol have authority to investigate and to make arrests for violations of such statutory provisions whenever an alleged violation involves unlawful taking of a motor vehicle.

Acts 1980, ch. 884, § 3; 1996, ch. 675, § 3.

4-7-115. Use of dogs to detect drugs.

The Tennessee highway patrol is authorized to utilize dogs trained to detect marijuana and other illicit substances in its work, as may be desirable and appropriate.

Acts 1983, ch. 120, § 2.

4-7-116. [Reserved.]

When a canine that was utilized in the service of the highway patrol is retired due to age, service-related injury, or any other reason, and the canine is retired to the care and custody of a highway patrol officer, whether active or retired, the department of safety, from funds budgeted to the department through the general appropriations act, shall pay, on a monthly basis, the officer caring for the retired canine the sum of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) to be used exclusively for the medical care of the retired canine.

The officer with custody of the retired canine shall maintain records of all medical treatment provided to the retired canine in the officer's care and custody and, by June 1 of each year, submit a copy of these medical records to the department of safety for the fiscal year ending at the end of that month.

Within thirty (30) days of the death of a retired canine in the care of a highway patrol officer, the officer shall notify the department of safety of the canine's death. Upon receiving notification pursuant to this subsection (c), the monthly medical treatment payments to the officer provided by this section shall cease.

The monthly amount set out in subsection (a) shall be in addition to any amount that is otherwise due and paid to the officer by virtue of salary, retirement, disability, or other reason.

Acts 2017, ch. 426, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-7-117 (Acts 1987, ch. 178, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 23; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16), concerning temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, was transferred to §4-6-148 by the code commission in 2011.

Acts 2017, ch. 426, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all highway patrol officers taking care and custody of a retiring canine on or after July 1, 2017.

4-7-118. Canine training for highway patrol officers.

Effective August 1, 2003, before a person appointed by the commissioner can become a commissioned member of the highway patrol, such person, as a part of the training for such position, shall complete a course of instruction in animal behavior generally and canine behavior specifically that complies with the requirements of § 38-8-117.

For members of the highway patrol who have completed the animal behavior training course required by subsections (a) and (c), any annual in-service training, required for members of the highway patrol, may also include the animal behavior training course.

Any member of the highway patrol who was employed prior to the time when the course of instruction required by subsection (a) was established and offered shall be required to complete it as part of any annual in-service training required of the highway patrol. Any such member shall have two (2) years from June 15, 2004, to receive the instruction required by subsection (a). Any officer who does not comply with this subsection (c) shall be subject to departmental disciplinary proceedings.

Any member of the highway patrol who completes a course of instruction in animal behavior approved by the POST commission for use as required in § 38-8-117, shall be in compliance with this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 940, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “General Patton Act of 2003.”

4-7-119. [Reserved.]

No member of the Tennessee highway patrol shall engage in political activity, support or opposition to any candidate, party or measure in any election when on duty or acting in the member's official capacity. When off duty and acting as a private citizen, no member of the Tennessee highway patrol shall be prohibited from engaging in political activity or denied the right to refrain from engaging in political activity.

Acts 2006, ch. 1009, § 7.

Cross-References. Political activity by law enforcement officers and Tennessee highway patrol officers, §38-8-310.

4-7-121. Officers trained to enforce federal immigration laws.

Highway patrol officers certified as trained in accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the state of Tennessee and the United States department of homeland security pursuant to §4-3-2015 are authorized to enforce federal immigration laws while performing within the scope of their authorized duties as state highway patrol officers.

Acts 2007, ch. 165, § 2.

4-7-122. Retired members — Employment by local enforcement agencies.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, retired members of the Tennessee highway patrol are eligible to be employed by local law enforcement agencies; provided, that the retired member meets the certification and firearms training requirements of the local law enforcement agency with which the retired member seeks employment.

Acts 2008, ch. 972, § 1.